bezhta_verb_lexicon.lexd
LEXICON Aux
гей<cop><prs>:гей	#	есть
гей<cop><neg>:гаьъаь
гей<cop><neg>:гаьъа
гей<cop><irr>:гāь
гей<cop><irr>:гāьлъе
гей<cop><neg><ptsp>:гаьччоь # не имеющий
гей<cop><neg><ptsp>:гаьччаь # не имеющий, (Forker 2006) p. 37 
гей<cop><ptsp>:гаьгьийо # имеющий
гей<cop><cvb><caus>:гаьлълъо # (Forker 2006) p. 38
гей<cop><cvb><cond><cnc>:гаьлъдана
гей<cop<neg>cvb>:гаьчӏел
нуцӏос<aux><prs>:нуцӏос
нуцӏос<aux><pst>:нуцӏойо

LEXICON DoRoot
ов:ов[inf]
ов:огь[nfin]
ов:овагь[pl]
ов:ой[val]
ов:ō[t]
